Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CATHOLIC CHARITIES SENIOR DINING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $420,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $420,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Catholic Charities of the Diocese of St. Cloud to operate its senior dining program. new text end